Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.290

Civil penalties.

The director may assess a civil penalty against a licensee, responsible individual, authorized delegate, or other person that violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per violation per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus this state's costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2017 c 30 s 19; 2003 c 287 s 31.]